test/src/morphology/V-aeqbtw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ä’bţõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est aidata/fin' - full paradigm
     ä’bţõ+V+Inf: ä’bţõ
     ä’bţõ+V+Ger: ä’bţõs
     ä’bţõ+V+Sup: ä’bţõm
     ä’bţõ+V+Sup+Ine: ä’bţõmõs
     ä’bţõ+V+Sup+Ela: ä’bţõmõst
     ä’bţõ+V+Sup+Tra: ä’bţõmõks
     ä’bţõ+V+Sup+Abe: ä’bţõmõt
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ä’bţõb
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ä’bţõt
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ä’bţõbõd
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ä’bţiz
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ä’bţizt, ä’bţiztõ]
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ä’bţizt, ä’bţiztõ]
     ä’bţõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ä’bţ
     ä’bţõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ä’bţõks
     ä’bţõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ä’bţ
     ä’bţõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ä’bţ
     ä’bţõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ä’bţõgid
     ä’bţõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ä’bţõg
     ä’bţõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ä’bţiji
     ä’bţõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ä’bţõn
     ä’bţõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ä’bţõd
